pt-PT: Estilo de franja: Franja com contas; Canotilho; Chainette; Franja de croché; Pestana; Franja de penas; Franja com nós; Franja de renda; Franja de escada; Franja de laços; Franja de macramé; Franja metálica; Franja de pompons; Franja de lantejoulas; Franja de borlas; Franja torcida; Outro
sl-SI: Slog obrob z resicami: Resice s perlicami; Debele resice (Bullion); Resice Chainette; Kvačkane resice; Eyelash (tanke resice); Resice s perjem; Vozlane resice; Čipkaste resice; Lestvičaste resice; Zankaste resice; Resice iz makrameja; Kovinske resice; Resice s cofi (pom-pomi); Resice z bleščicami; Resice s čopki; Zvite resice; Drugo
de: Stil der Fransenborte: Perlenfransen; Bouillon; Kettenfransen; Häkelfransen; Wimpernfransen; Federfransen; Geknüpfte Fransen; Spitzenfransen; Leiterfransen; Schlaufenfransen; Makramee-Fransen; Metallic-Fransen; Pompon-Fransen; Paillettenfransen; Quastenfransen; Gedrehte Fransen; Sonstige
fr: Style de garniture à franges: Frange perlée; Bouillon; Chaînette; Frange au crochet; À cils; Frange en plumes; Frange nouée; Frange en dentelle; Frange échelle; Frange à boucles; Frange en macramé; Frange métallique; Frange à pompons; Frange à paillettes; Frange à glands; Frange torsadée; Autre
ro-RO: Stil de bordură cu franjuri: Franjuri cu mărgele; Franjuri din fir răsucit (bullion); Franjuri din lănțișor; Franjuri croșetați; Franjuri tip geană (eyelash); Franjuri din pene; Franjuri înnodați; Franjuri din dantelă; Franjuri tip scară; Franjuri în buclă; Franjuri din macrame; Franjuri metalizați; Franjuri cu pompoane; Franjuri cu paiete; Franjuri cu ciucuri; Franjuri răsuciți; Altele
ru: Стиль отделки бахромой: Бахрома с бисером; Бахрома из канители; Нитяная бахрома; Вязаная бахрома; Бахрома-реснички; Бахрома из перьев; Узелковая бахрома; Кружевная бахрома; Бахрома-лесенка; Петельная бахрома; Бахрома макраме; Металлизированная бахрома; Бахрома с помпонами; Бахрома с пайетками; Бахрома с кисточками; Крученая бахрома; Другое
da: Stil for frynsekanter: Perlefrynser; Bullion; Chainette; Hæklede frynser; Eyelash; Fjerfrynser; Knyttede frynser; Blondefrynser; Stigefrynser; Løkkefrynser; Macramé-frynser; Metalliske frynser; Pompom-frynser; Pailletfrynser; Kvastfrynser; Snoede frynser; Andet
nb: Frynsekantstil: Frynser med perler; Bullion; Chainette; Heklet frynse; Eyelash; Fjærfrynse; Knyttet frynse; Blondefrynse; Stigefrynse; Løkkefrynse; Makraméfrynse; Metallisk frynse; Pompong-frynse; Paljettfrynse; Duskefrynse; Vridd frynse; Annet
zh-CN: 流苏饰边样式: 串珠流苏; 粗流苏; 细绳流苏; 钩织流苏; 睫毛形流苏; 羽毛流苏; 打结流苏; 蕾丝流苏; 梯形流苏; 环状流苏; 绳结编织流苏; 金属丝流苏; 绒球流苏; 亮片流苏; 穗状流苏; 扭结流苏; 其他
lt-LT: Kutų apvado stilius: Kutai su karoliukais; Susukti kutai (Bullion); Grandinėliniai kutai; Nerti kutai; Blakstieniniai kutai; Plunksnų kutai; Surišti kutai; Nėriniuoti kutai; Kopėtėlių formos kutai; Kilpiniai kutai; Makramė kutai; Metaliniai kutai; Kutai su bumbulais; Kutai su žvyneliais; Kutai; Susukti kutai; Kita
cs: Styl s třásněmi: Korálkové třásně; Buliové; Řetízkové; Háčkované třásně; Řasové; Péřové třásně; Vázané třásně; Krajkové třásně; Žebříkové třásně; Smyčkové třásně; Makramé třásně; Metalické třásně; Bambulkové třásně; Flitrové třásně; Střapcové třásně; Kroucené třásně; Ostatní
fi: Hapsujen leikkaustyyli: Helmihapsu; Kierrehapsu; Ketjuhapsu; Virkattu hapsu; Ripsihapsu; Höyhenhapsu; Solmittu hapsu; Pitsihapsu; Tikashapsu; Lenkkihapsu; Makrameehapsu; Metallinhohtoinen hapsu; Pompom-hapsu; Paljettihapsu; Tupsuhapsu; Kierretty hapsu; Muu
sk-SK: Štýl strapcového lemu: Korálkové strapce; Krútené strapce (bullion); Retiazkové strapce; Háčkované strapce; Riasové strapce; Pierkové strapce; Uzlové strapce; Čipkované strapce; Rebríčkové strapce; Slučkové strapce; Makramé strapce; Metalické strapce; Brmbolcové strapce; Flitrové strapce; Strapcové lemovanie; Točené strapce; Iné
vi: Kiểu viền tua rua: Tua rua đính cườm; Dạng xoắn; Dạng xích; Tua rua đan móc; Tua rua dạng lông mi; Tua rua dạng lông vũ; Tua rua thắt nút; Tua rua viền ren; Tua rua dạng thang; Tua rua dạng vòng; Tua rua macramé; Tua rua ánh kim; Tua rua cục bông; Tua rua đính sequin; Tua rua; Tua rua xoắn; Khác
nl: Franjeafwerking stijl: Kralenfranje; Torsi; Ketting; Gehaakte franje; Wimperfranje; Verenfranje; Geknoopte franje; Kantfranje; Ladderfranje; Lussenfranje; Macraméfranje; Metallic-franje; Pomponfranje; Paillettenfranje; Kwastjesfranje; Gedraaide franje; Anders
el: Στυλ τρέσας με κρόσσια: Κρόσσια με χάντρες; Bullion; Αλυσίδα; Πλεκτά κρόσσια; Βλεφαρίδα; Κρόσσια με φτερά; Κρόσσια με κόμπους; Δαντελένια κρόσσια; Κρόσσια τύπου σκάλας; Κρόσσια με θηλιές; Κρόσσια μακραμέ; Μεταλλικά κρόσσια; Κρόσσια με πον πον; Κρόσσια με πούλιες; Κρόσσια με φούντες; Στριφτά κρόσσια; Άλλο
pt-BR: Estilo da franja: Franja de miçangas; Franja torçal; Franja de fios; Franja de crochê; Franja eyelash; Franja de penas; Franja com nós; Franja de renda; Franja escada; Franja em argola; Franja de macramê; Franja metalizada; Franja de pompom; Franja de lantejoulas; Franja com tassel; Franja torcida; Outro
zh-TW: 流蘇飾邊樣式: 串珠流蘇; 粗穗流蘇; 鍊條流蘇; 鉤織流蘇; 睫毛流蘇; 羽毛流蘇; 打結流蘇; 蕾絲流蘇; 梯形流蘇; 圈圈流蘇; 繩編流蘇; 金屬光澤流蘇; 絨球流蘇; 亮片流蘇; 穗狀流蘇; 扭繩流蘇; 其他
hu: Rojtos szegély stílusa: Gyöngyös rojt; Sodrott rojt; Láncos; Horgolt rojt; Szempilla; Tollrojt; Csomózott rojt; Csipkerojt; Létrás rojt; Hurkolt rojt; Makramé rojt; Fémes rojt; Pomponos rojt; Flitteres rojt; Bojtos rojt; Csavart rojt; Egyéb
bg-BG: Стил на декоративните ресни: Ресни с мъниста; Усукани ресни; Верижни ресни; Плетени ресни; Ресни тип мигла; Ресни с пера; Ресни с възли; Дантелени ресни; Стъпаловидни ресни; Ресни с примки; Макраме ресни; Метални ресни; Ресни с помпони; Ресни с пайети; Ресни с пискюли; Усукани ресни; Друго
ko: 프린지 장식 유형: 비즈 프린지; 불리온; 체이네트; 크로셰 프린지; 아이래시; 깃털 프린지; 매듭 프린지; 레이스 프린지; 래더 프린지; 루프 프린지; 마크라메 프린지; 메탈릭 프린지; 폼폼 프린지; 스팽글 프린지; 태슬 프린지; 트위스트 프린지; 기타
en: Fringe trim style: Beaded fringe; Bullion; Chainette; Crochet fringe; Eyelash; Feather fringe; Knotted fringe; Lace fringe; Ladder fringe; Loop fringe; Macramé fringe; Metallic fringe; Pom-pom fringe; Sequin fringe; Tassel fringe; Twisted fringe; Other
ja: フリンジトリムスタイル: ビーズフリンジ; ブリオン; チェーネット; クロシェフリンジ; アイラッシュ; フェザーフリンジ; ノットフリンジ; レースフリンジ; ラダーフリンジ; ループフリンジ; マクラメフリンジ; メタリックフリンジ; ポンポンフリンジ; スパンコールフリンジ; タッセルフリンジ; ツイストフリンジ; その他
sv: Franskantstil: Pärlfrans; Buljonfrans; Kedjefrans; Virkad frans; Eyelash; Fjäderfrans; Knuten frans; Spetsfrans; Stegfrans; Öglefrans; Makraméfrans; Metallisk frans; Bollfrans; Paljettfrans; Tofsfrans; Tvinnad frans; Övrigt
hr-HR: Stil sa resicama: Resice s perlicama; Upletene resice; Chainette; Heklane resice; Trepavice; Resice od perja; Resice s čvorovima; Čipkaste resice; Ljestvičaste resice; Resice s petljama; Makrame resice; Metalik resice; Resice s pomponima; Resice sa šljokicama; Resice s kićankama; Uvijene resice; Ostalo
pl: Styl taśmy z frędzlami: Frędzle z koralikami; Frędzle bulionowe; Frędzle łańcuszkowe; Frędzle szydełkowe; Frędzle typu rzęsy; Frędzle z piór; Frędzle wiązane; Frędzle koronkowe; Frędzle drabinkowe; Frędzle pętelkowe; Frędzle makramowe; Frędzle metaliczne; Frędzle z pomponami; Frędzle z cekinami; Frędzle z chwostami; Frędzle skręcane; Inne
tr: Püskül şerit stil türü: Boncuklu püskül; Bulyon; Zincir; Tığ işi püskül; Kirpik; Tüy püskül; Düğümlü püskül; Dantel püskül; Merdiven püskül; Halka püskül; Makrome püskül; Metalik püskül; Ponponlu püskül; Pullu püskül; Püsküllü saçak; Bükümlü püskül; Diğer
th: สไตล์ขอบระบาย: พู่ลูกปัด; แบบเกลียว; แบบเชือกถัก; พู่โครเชต์; แบบขนตา; พู่ขนนก; พู่แบบผูกปม; พู่ลูกไม้; พู่แบบขั้นบันได; พู่แบบห่วง; พู่มาคราเม่; พู่เมทัลลิก; พู่ปอมปอม; พู่เลื่อม; พู่ตุ้งติ้ง; พู่แบบบิดเกลียว; อื่นๆ
it: Stile di rifinitura con frange: Frangia con perline; Canottiglia; Catenella; Frangia all’uncinetto; A ciglia; Frangia con piume; Frangia annodata; Frangia in pizzo; Frangia a scala; Frangia ad anello; Frangia in macramè; Frangia metallizzata; Frangia con pompon; Frangia con paillettes; Frangia con nappe; Frangia ritorta; Altro
es: Estilo de ribete con flecos: Flecos con cuentas; Fleco de canutillo; Cadeneta; Fleco de croché; Pestaña; Fleco de plumas; Fleco anudado; Fleco de encaje; Fleco de escalera; Fleco de bucle; Fleco de macramé; Fleco metálico; Fleco de pompones; Fleco de lentejuelas; Fleco de borlas; Fleco retorcido; Otro